Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 281, O.S.L.
2023, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 408, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 5-148.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 5-148.2. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the State Department of Education to
be designated the “School Security Revolving Fund”. The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Education from:
1. Reimbursements, grants, or other monies received from other
state agencies and entities for school security;
2. Reimbursements, grants, or other monies received from the
United States government obligated to school security projects;
3. Gifts, donations, and bequests; and
4. Monies appropriated or apportioned by the Legislature.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1189 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. All monies accruing to the credit of the School Security
Revolving Fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the State Department of Education for the purposes of:
1. Establishing and maintaining a School Resource Officer
Program; and
2. Providing physical security enhancements for schools
including, but not limited to, school resource officers, cameras,
gates, lighting, locks, doors, windows, security geofencing,
ballistic storm shelters, and mobile panic alert systems.
Monies in the School Security Revolving Fund shall supplement
and not supplant existing school security funding.
C. Expenditures from the School Security Revolving Fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
Expenditures from the School Security Revolving Fund shall not
exceed Subject to the availability of funding, Fifty Million Dollars
($50,000,000.00) in any fiscal year and shall be allocated from the
School Security Revolving Fund and divided equally among every
public school district in the this state each fiscal year for three
(3) fiscal years beginning July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1189 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
February 18, 2026 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1189 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)